Nevada, session 83, SB436.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Division shall:
(a) Establish a statewide registry of landlords that consists of
the following information for each landlord:
(1) The name of the landlord;
(2) The state and county in which the landlord is domiciled;
(3) The total number of dwelling units owned by the
landlord in this State;
(4) The address of each dwelling unit described in
subparagraph (3);
(5) The amount of the periodic rent charged by the landlord
for each dwelling unit described in subparagraph (3) and the
frequency with which the periodic rent is charged to the tenant of
each dwelling unit; and
(6) The name of the property manager of the premises and
the name of the real estate broker with whom the property
manager is associated, if applicable;
(b) Establish a mechanism by which a tenant may file a
complaint concerning a landlord; and
(c) Post complaints concerning landlords filed by tenants
pursuant to paragraph (b) on the Internet website of the Division.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each
landlord shall report to the Division the information described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 on or before January 1 of each year
and any time there is a change in the information described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 as that information relates to the
landlord.
3. If a landlord is a member of an association, the association
shall, on behalf of the landlord, report to the Division the
information described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 on or
before January 1 of each year.
4. A report described in subsection 2 or 3 must be made in the
manner prescribed by the Division.
5. A property manager may not provide services to a landlord
who is not listed in the registry described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1.
6. The Division may establish by regulation an annual
registration fee which the Division may impose on a landlord who
registers with a registry established pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1. If such a fee is imposed, all revenue from fees
-
*SB436*

– 4 –
collected pursuant to this subsection must be used by the Division
to defray the administrative costs associated with implementing:
(a) The registry established pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1; and
(b) The mechanism for filing and posting complaints
concerning landlords pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (c) of
subsection 1.
7. This section applies to any landlord who:
(a) Uses a property manager for any number of dwelling units
in this State; or
(b) Owns five or more dwelling units in this State, regardless
of whether the landlord uses a property manager for any such
dwelling unit.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Association” means an organization focused on the rental
housing industry in this State which, for valuable consideration,
provides membership to landlords, developers, property managers
or like actors in the rental housing industry in exchange for the
provision of services, information, educational opportunities or
like benefits relating to the rental housing industry to members of
the organization.
(b) “Division” means the Housing Division of the Department
of Business and Industry.
(c) “Property manager” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.0195.
(d) “Real estate broker” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 645.030.
Sec. 3. 1. If a tenant gives written notice to a landlord
pursuant to NRS 118A.380, the tenant may, at any time before the
landlord has remedied the breach, submit a written request to the
landlord for alternative accommodations. Not later than 24 hours
after receipt of the request, the landlord shall provide to the tenant
and, except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this act,
continuously maintain for the tenant thereafter until the breach is
remedied:
(a) A comparable dwelling unit, as selected by the landlord, at
no cost to the tenant; or
(b) A hotel room, as selected by the landlord, at no cost to the
tenant.
2. A comparable dwelling unit or hotel room provided
pursuant to subsection 1 must include at least the same number of
beds as there are beds used in the dwelling unit of the tenant.
3. If a tenant requires a comparable dwelling unit or hotel
room for more than 48 hours:
-
*SB436*

– 5 –
(a) The comparable dwelling unit or hotel room must include a
refrigerator with a freezer and a range, stove or oven; or
(b) The landlord must provide a per diem allowance for daily
meals and incidentals for each tenant in an amount that is at least
equal to the per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally. The landlord must provide the per diem
allowance to the tenant at the time the landlord reasonably expects
the tenant to be in a comparable dwelling or hotel room for more
than 48 hours and for every 24-hour period thereafter.
4. A comparable dwelling unit or hotel room must be:
(a) Habitable;
(b) Accessible to a person with disabilities if the tenant has a
disability; and
(c) Located not more than 5 miles from the dwelling unit of the
tenant, unless the tenant consents to a comparable dwelling unit
or hotel room that is located more than 5 miles from the dwelling
unit of the tenant. The landlord may select a comparable dwelling
unit or hotel room that is located more than 5 miles but less than
10 miles from the dwelling unit of the tenant if the comparable
dwelling unit or hotel room that is farther away from the dwelling
unit of the tenant is substantially less expensive than other options
that are available not more than 5 miles from the dwelling unit of
the tenant. If a dwelling unit or hotel room located 5 miles or 10
miles, as applicable pursuant to this subsection, from the dwelling
unit of the tenant is not available for the use of the tenant in
accordance with this subsection, the landlord must select the
nearest available comparable dwelling unit or hotel room.
5. If a tenant is relocated pursuant to this section, a landlord
is required to pay for only the following expenses that arise from
relocating the tenant:
(a) A per diem allowance pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 3, if applicable; and
(b) Reasonable costs that are incurred due to the relocation of
the tenant, including, without limitation, costs of storage and
transportation.
6. A tenant who is provided relocation pursuant to this
section is not relieved of the obligation to pay rent to the landlord.
Sec. 4. 1. If a tenant is provided a hotel room pursuant to
section 3 of this act and, due to circumstances beyond the
reasonable control of the landlord, the breach cannot be remedied
by a date which is 60 days after the date on which the tenant’s
occupancy in the hotel room began, the obligation of the landlord
to provide the hotel room to the tenant terminates on that date.
2. A landlord who determines that, due to circumstances
beyond his or her reasonable control, a breach cannot be
-
*SB436*

– 6 –
remedied within 60 days after the date on which a tenant’s
occupancy in a hotel room began shall:
(a) Provide to the tenant, at the earliest opportunity, written
notice that specifies:
(1) That the breach cannot be remedied by a date which is
60 days after the date on which the tenant’s occupancy in the hotel
began;
(2) The date on which the hotel room will no longer be
provided to the tenant at the expense of the landlord, which date
must be not earlier than 60 days after the date on which the
tenant’s occupancy in the hotel room at the expense of the
landlord began; and
(3) That the tenant may terminate his or her rental
agreement with no liability or financial penalty to the tenant; and
(b) Return to the tenant the tenant’s full security deposit, if
any, on or before the date that the landlord provides notice to the
tenant pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 5. NRS 118A.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.380 1. If the landlord is required by the rental
agreement or this chapter to supply heat, air-conditioning, running
water, hot water, electricity, gas, a functioning door lock or another
essential item or service and the landlord willfully or negligently
fails to do so, causing the premises to become unfit for habitation,
the tenant shall give written notice to the landlord specifying the
breach. If the landlord does not adequately remedy the breach, or
use his or her best efforts to remedy the breach within 48 hours,
except a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, after it is received by
the landlord, or fails to comply with the requirements of sections 3
and 4 of this act, the tenant may, in addition to any other remedy:
(a) Procure reasonable amounts of such essential items or
services during the landlord’s noncompliance and deduct their
actual and reasonable cost from the rent;
(b) Recover actual damages, including damages based upon the
lack of use of the premises or the diminution of the fair rental value
of the dwelling unit;
(c) Withhold any rent that becomes due during the landlord’s
noncompliance without incurring late fees, charges for notice or any
other charge or fee authorized by this chapter or the rental
agreement, until the landlord has attempted in good faith to restore
the essential items or services; or
(d) Procure other housing which is comparable during the
landlord’s noncompliance, and the rent for the original premises
fully abates during this period. The tenant may recover the actual
and reasonable cost of that other housing which is in excess of the
amount of rent which is abated.
-
*SB436*

– 7 –
2. If the tenant proceeds under this section, the tenant may not
proceed under NRS 118A.350 and 118A.360 as to that breach.
3. The rights of the tenant under this section do not arise until
the tenant has given written notice as required by subsection 1,
except that the tenant may, without having given that notice:
(a) Recover damages as authorized under paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 if the landlord:
(1) Admits to the court that the landlord had knowledge of
the lack of such essential items or services; or
(2) Has received written notice of the uninhabitable
condition caused by such a lack from a governmental agency
authorized to inspect for violations of building, housing or health
codes.
(b) Withhold rent under paragraph (c) of subsection 1 if the
landlord:
(1) Has received written notice of the condition constituting
the breach from a governmental agency authorized to inspect for
violations of building, housing or health codes; and
(2) Fails to remedy or attempt in good faith to remedy the
breach within the time prescribed in the written notice of that
condition from the governmental agency.
4. The rights of the tenant under paragraph (c) of subsection 1
do not arise unless the tenant is current in the payment of rent at the
time of giving written notice pursuant to subsection 1.
5. If such a condition was caused by the deliberate or negligent
act or omission of the tenant, a member of his or her household or
other person on the premises with his or her consent, the tenant has
no rights under this section.
H
-
*SB436*